Utah statutes.
77-13-2.   Record of plea -- Effect of each kind of plea.
Every plea shall be entered upon the record of the court and shall have the
following effect:
(1)  A plea of not guilty is a denial of the guilt of the accused and puts in
issue every material allegation of the information or indictment;
(2)  A plea of guilty is an acknowledgment that the accused is guilty of the
offense charged; and
(3)  A plea of no contest indicates the accused does not challenge the charges
in the information or indictment and if accepted by the court shall have the
same effect as a plea of guilty and imposition of sentence may be rendered in
the same manner as if a plea of guilty had been entered.
